California, session 20252026, SB1214.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 424.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:424.4. (a) The California State Library shall conduct a study, in consultation with the public, on the best candidate for the official State Butterfly.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the California State Library shall submit a report to the Legislature with the California State Library’s recommendations based on the study conducted pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.(c) This section shall be repealed on January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 10231.5.SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)The western monarch butterfly is found throughout California and is easily recognized by its distinctive orange, black, and white wing pattern.(b)The western monarch butterfly migrates more than 1,000 miles from the Rocky Mountain region to coastal California, where they overwinter at sites ranging from the County of Mendocino to Baja California from approximately October through February.(c)During migration, western monarch populations have historically numbered between 20,000 and 200,000 butterflies along the California coast.(d)During fall migration, monarch butterflies can be found in southern California desert regions, including the Coachella Valley, where they arrive in late September through early October to feed on the native milkweed species, including the evergreen rush milkweed.(e)Butterflies play a vital ecological role as pollinators across California’s diverse ecosystems.SEC. 2.Section 424.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:424.4.The western monarch butterfly (danaus plexippus) is the official State Butterfly.